Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 5 Domestication [Effective January 1, 2023.]

7-12.1-1151.
Domestication authorized. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

By complying with this part, a domestic limited liability partnership may become a foreign limited liability partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

By complying with the provisions of this part applicable to foreign limited liability partnerships, a foreign limited liability partnership may become a domestic limited liability partnership if the domestication is authorized by the law of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of formation.

If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited liability partnership but does not refer to a domestication, the provision applies to a domestication of the limited liability partnership as if the domestication were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2023.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1152.
Plan of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A domestic limited liability partnership may become a foreign limited liability partnership in a domestication by approving a plan of domestication. The plan must be in a record and contain:

The name of the domesticating limited liability partnership;

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited liability partnership;

The manner of converting the interests in the domesticating limited liability partnership into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

The proposed statement of qualification of the domesticated limited liability partnership;

The full text of the provisions of the partnership agreement of the domesticated limited liability partnership that are proposed to be in a record;

The other terms and conditions of the domestication; and

Any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the domesticating limited liability partnership.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, a plan of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1153.
Approval of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of domestication of a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership is not effective unless it has been approved:

By all the partners entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

In a record, by each partner that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the domestication becomes effective, unless:

The partnership agreement of the domesticating partnership in a record provides for the approval of a domestication or merger in which some or all of its partners become subject to interest holder liability by the affirmative vote or consent of fewer than all the partners; and

The partner voted for or consented in a record to that provision of the partnership agreement or became a partner after the adoption of that provision.

A domestication of a foreign domesticating limited liability partnership is not effective unless it is approved in accordance with the law of the foreign limited liability partnership’s jurisdiction of formation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1154.
Amendment or abandonment of plan of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A plan of domestication of a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership may be amended:

In the same manner as the plan was approved, if the plan does not provide for the manner in which it may be amended; or

By its partners in the manner provided in the plan, but a partner that was entitled to vote on or consent to approval of the domestication is entitled to vote on or consent to any amendment of the plan that will change:

The amount or kind of interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing, to be received by any of the partners of the domesticating limited liability partnership under the plan;

The partnership agreement of the domesticated limited liability partnership that will be in effect immediately after the domestication becomes effective, except for changes that do not require approval of the partners of the domesticated limited liability partnership under its organic law or partnership agreement; or

Any other terms or conditions of the plan, if the change would adversely affect the partner in any material respect.

After a plan of domestication has been approved by a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership and before a statement of domestication becomes effective, the plan may be abandoned as provided in the plan. Unless prohibited by the plan, a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership may abandon the plan in the same manner as the plan was approved.

If a plan of domestication is abandoned after a statement of domestication has been filed with the secretary of state and before the statement becomes effective, a statement of abandonment, signed by the domesticating limited liability partnership, must be filed with the secretary of state before the statement of domestication becomes effective. The statement of abandonment takes effect on filing, and the domestication is abandoned and does not become effective. The statement of abandonment must contain:

The name of the domesticating limited liability partnership;

The date on which the statement of domestication was filed by the secretary of state; and

A statement that the domestication has been abandoned in accordance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1155.
Statement of domestication — Effective date of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A statement of domestication must be signed by the domesticating limited partnership and filed with the secretary of state.

A statement of domestication must contain:

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticating limited liability partnership;

The name and jurisdiction of formation of the domesticated limited liability partnership;

If the domesticating limited liability partnership is a domestic limited liability partnership, a statement that the plan of domestication was approved in accordance with this part or, if the domesticating limited liability partnership is a foreign limited liability partnership, a statement that the domestication was approved in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of formation; and

The statement of qualification of the domesticated limited liability partnership, as an attachment.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, a statement of domestication may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

The statement of qualification of a domesticated domestic limited liability partnership must satisfy the requirements of this chapter, but the statement does not need to be signed.

If the domesticated entity is a domestic partnership, the domestication becomes effective when the statement of domestication is effective. If the domesticated entity is a foreign partnership, the domestication becomes effective on the later of:

The date and time provided in the organic law of the domesticated entity; and

When the statement is effective.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1156.
Effect of domestication. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

When a domestication becomes effective:

The domesticated entity is:

Organized under and thereafter subject to the organic law of the domesticated entity; and

The same entity without interruption as the domesticating entity;

All property of the domesticating entity continues to be vested in the domesticated entity without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticating entity continue as debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the domesticated entity;

Except as otherwise provided by law or the plan of domestication, all the rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and purposes of the domesticating entity remain in the domesticated entity;

The name of the domesticated entity may be substituted for the name of the domesticating entity in any pending action or proceeding;

The statement of qualification of the domesticated entity becomes effective;

The provisions of the partnership agreement of the domesticated entity that are to be in a record, if any, approved as part of the plan of domestication become effective; and

The interests in the domesticating entity are converted to the extent and as approved in connection with the domestication, and the partners of the domesticating entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the plan of domestication and to any appraisal rights they have under §

7-12.1-1106

.

Except as otherwise provided in the organic law or partnership agreement of the domesticating limited liability partnership, the domestication does not give rise to any rights that a partner or third party would otherwise have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of the domesticating partnership.

When a domestication becomes effective, a person that did not have interest holder liability with respect to the domesticating limited liability partnership and becomes subject to interest holder liability with respect to a domestic limited liability partnership as a result of the domestication has interest holder liability only to the extent provided by this chapter and only for those debts, obligations, and other liabilities that are incurred after the domestication becomes effective.

When a domestication becomes effective, the interest holder liability of a person that ceases to hold an interest in a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership with respect to which the person had interest holder liability is subject to the following rules:

The domestication does not discharge any interest holder liability under this chapter to the extent the interest holder liability was incurred before the domestication became effective.

A person does not have interest holder liability under this chapter for any debt, obligation, or other liability that is incurred after the domestication becomes effective.

This chapter continues to apply to the release, collection, or discharge of any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the domestication had not occurred.

A person has whatever rights of contribution from any other person as are provided by this chapter, law other than this chapter, or the partnership agreement of the domestic domesticating limited liability partnership with respect to any interest holder liability preserved under subsection (d)(1) of this section as if the domestication had not occurred.

When a domestication becomes effective, a foreign limited liability partnership that is the domesticated partnership may be served with process in this state for the collection and enforcement of any of its debts, obligations, and other liabilities as provided in §

7-12.1-119

.

If the domesticating limited liability partnership is a registered foreign entity, the registration of the partnership is canceled when the domestication becomes effective.

A domestication does not require a domestic domesticating limited liability partnership to wind up its business and does not constitute or cause the dissolution of the partnership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1201.
Uniformity of application and construction. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1202.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1203.
Savings clause. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

This chapter does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before January 1, 2023.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-1204.
Severability clause. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.